Hawaii statutes.
§346-247 Payment for service or treatment
provided to a party. Whenever service, treatment, care, or support
of a vulnerable adult is provided under this part, the persons or legal
entities who may be legally obligated to pay for the service, treatment, care,
or support of the vulnerable adult, may be ordered by the court to pay the cost
of the service, care, support, or treatment provided to the vulnerable adult in
whole or in part, after notice and hearing. [L 1989, c 381, pt of §1; am L
1990, c 144, §1 and c 234, §9; am L 2008, c 154, §24]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next